Louisiana, session 2026, HB758.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:2011(A)(1), (D)(22)(b) and (c), and (25), 2014(B), (D)(2), (3),
(4), and (7), 2063(J), 2195.3(B), 2289.1(D), 2351.59(B), and (C) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 30:2014(E), (F), and (G) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2011. Department of Environmental Quality; creation; duties; powers; structure
A.(1) There is hereby created the Department of Environmental Quality
which shall be the primary agency in the state concerned with environmental
protection and regulation. The department shall have jurisdiction over matters
affecting the regulation of the environment within the state, including but not limited
to the regulation of air quality, noise pollution control, water pollution control, the
regulation of solid waste disposal, the protection and preservation of the scenic rivers
and streams of the state, the regulation and control of radiation, the management of
hazardous waste, groundwater protection, underground storage tanks, and the
regulation of those programs which encourage, assist, and result in the reduction of
wastes generated within Louisiana.
* * *
Page 1 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 758 ENROLLED
D. The secretary shall have the following powers and duties:
* * *
(22)
* * *
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 30:2014(D)(3) or R.S. 49:971(A),
the secretary is hereby authorized to establish a fee schedule in accordance with
Subparagraph (c) of this Paragraph for any application for accreditation by a
commercial laboratory under the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph.
The secretary is hereby authorized to establish a fee schedule for the certification of
any commercial laboratory under the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph.
(c) The fee schedule authorized by Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph shall
not exceed the following amounts: be determined by using a formula developed by
rules based upon the test category per matrix, accreditation requested, and location
of the laboratory.
(i) Accreditation application fee $ 726.00
payable every scope amendment
and every three-year renewal.
(ii)(aa) Per major test category per $ 363.00
matrix payable every year, or
(bb) Minor conventional category $ 290.00
payable every year.
(iii) Annual surveillance and evaluation $ 363.00
applicable to minor conventional
facilities and facilities applying for
only one category of accreditation.
(iv) Annual fee for dependent mobile lab $ 363.00
laboratories, per mobile
(v)(aa) Proficiency samples biannually to be
purchased by the laboratory.
Page 2 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 758 ENROLLED
(bb) Bioassay/biomonitoring annually to
be purchased by the laboratory.
(vi) Third party audit to be billed directly to
the laboratory.
(vii) The accreditation fees for in-state laboratories
receiving national accreditation will be one and
one-half times the regular fees.
(viii) The accreditation fees for out-of-state laboratories
receiving state accreditation will be
one and one-half times the regular fees.
(ix) The accreditation fees for out-of-state laboratories
receiving national accreditation will be
two times the regular fees.
(x) Interim accreditation application fees will be
two times the regular fees.
* * *
(25) To promulgate rules and regulations providing for conducting requested
reviews of environmental conditions of a specified tract of immovable property,
including but not limited to requests for no further action letters. Such rules may
provide for a fee for each request by the landowner or a party with an interest in a
real estate transaction involving the specified property not to exceed the maximum
per hour overtime salary, including associated-related benefits, of a civil service
employee of the department per hour or portion thereof required to conduct the
review plus reasonable indirect costs calculated as a percentage of the hourly fee.
Such percentage shall be determined annually by agreement between the department
and the United States Environmental Protection Agency for use on grants and
contracts. However, the department shall require a requestor to pay a minimum fee
not exceeding one thousand six hundred fifty dollars prior to conducting the review.
* * *
Page 3 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 758 ENROLLED
§2014. Permits, licenses, registrations, variances, and fees
* * *
B. In order to provide for adequate permitting, monitoring, investigation,
administration, and other activities required for the maintenance of a healthful and
safe environment, an initial application fee and an annual monitoring and
maintenance fee shall be charged for all permits, licenses, registrations, or variances
authorized by this Subtitle. These fees shall be determined, except as otherwise
provided in this Subtitle relative to maximum amounts of fees, using a formula
developed by rules to be based upon a cost equal to the cost of the annual
maintenance, permitting, monitoring, investigation, administration, and other
activities required therewith, including any effects the volume of emissions or
effluents may have on such activities. Any such formula or fees shall be adopted by
the department by rule in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S.
49:950 et seq. Funds generated from these fees shall be deposited in the
Environmental Trust Dedicated Fund Account as provided in R.S. 30:2015 unless
specified elsewhere.
* * *
D.
* * *
(2) Unless otherwise provided by law, the department is prohibited from
adjusting, modifying, or otherwise changing the formula for any fee authorized under
this Section in a manner that would increase the fee paid by any person by more than
five percent of the relevant fee paid by such person in the previous fiscal year.
However, this Paragraph shall not apply to fees imposed by the department for any
underground storage tanks as provided in R.S. 30:2194. The department is
authorized to adjust, modify, or otherwise change the formula for any fee authorized
under this Section based on the annual rate of the Consumer Price Index for All
Urban Consumers maintained by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of
Labor Statistics. This change can be aggregated for each year the formula has not
Page 4 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 758 ENROLLED
been altered. The department shall adjust fee amounts through the rulemaking
process.
(3) The department is prohibited from creating any new fees under this
Subtitle, but is authorized to adjust or modify fees for activities authorized under this
Subtitle or to change the formula if the need arises due to new technology, correction
of errors, new industry, federal obligations, and budgetary concerns. The department
shall promulgate rules to determine these fees by using a formula to be based upon
a cost equal to the cost of the annual maintenance, permitting, monitoring,
investigation, administration, and other activities required therewith, including any
effects the volume of emissions or effluents may have on such activities.
(4)(a) In accordance with the provisions of Article VII, Section 2.1 of the
Constitution of Louisiana, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
Department of Environmental Quality may modify any fee that is in effect on June
30, 2002, is authorized by this Title, and is required to be deposited into the
Environmental Trust Dedicated Fund Account. Such a modification may increase the
rate in effect on June 30, 2002, over the two-year fiscal period beginning July 1,
2002, as follows: the department may increase any such fee by a maximum of twenty
percent, effective on or after July 1, 2002, and by a maximum of ten percent above
the rate in effect on June 30, 2003, effective on or after July 1, 2003. Within ninety
days of the promulgation and adoption of any regulation necessary to implement the
fees herein, the Department of Environmental Quality shall submit a written report
to the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget for its approval which details the
proposed use for the fee increase, efforts to decrease the processing time for permits,
efforts to increase the number of inspections conducted at regulated facilities,
enforcement activities, and efforts to increase the collection of fines imposed by the
Department of Environmental Quality. the secretary may establish fees within each
medium the department regulates through the rulemaking process. The fees charged
shall be reflective of the department's work and costs necessary to issue and enforce
each permit, and the corresponding fee schedules and matrices shall contemplate the
scale and scope of each permit, facility, or other parameters necessary to determine
Page 5 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 758 ENROLLED
the fees the department will assess. The fees promulgated by the department shall
not exceed the following:
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
Department of Environmental Quality may increase the following fees from the
amounts in effect on March 14, 2015, as authorized by this Title or any rule or
regulation promulgated pursuant thereto, and is required to be deposited into the
Environmental Trust Dedicated Fund Account as follows:
(i) Ground water fees provided for in Chapter 14 of Part 1 of Title 33 of the
Louisiana Administrative Code may be increased by up to ten percent.
(ii) Air fees provided for in Part III of Title 33 of the Louisiana
Administrative Code may be increased by up to ten percent. A minimum application
fee of five hundred dollars and a minimum annual maintenance fee of two-hundred
fifty dollars may be established. The maximum annual maintenance fee for natural
gas compressors provided in LAC 33:III.223, Table 1, Categories 1430 through 1490
shall not exceed forty-one thousand six hundred twelve dollars for any one gas
transmission permit. In addition, the secretary is hereby authorized to establish a fee
schedule for the following:
(aa) An application fee for a new, modification, or renewal of an acid rain
permit not to exceed five hundred dollars.
(bb) An application fee for the renewal with no modification of an operating
permit not to exceed the minimum minor permit modification fee.
(cc) An annual fee charged for sources permitted pursuant to 40 CFR Part 70
and required to obtain a permit pursuant to Title V of the federal Clean Air Act not
to exceed twenty percent of the total annual maintenance fees.
(iii) Hazardous waste fees provided in Part V of Title 33 of the Louisiana
Administrative Code may be increased by up to twenty-five percent. In addition, the
secretary is hereby authorized to establish a fee schedule for the following:
(aa) An annual maintenance fee for hazardous waste treatment, storage, and
disposal facilities that are in post-closure not to exceed four thousand one hundred
twenty-five dollars.
Page 6 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 758 ENROLLED
(bb) An application fee for hazardous waste transfer facilities not to exceed
one thousand nine hundred dollars.
(cc) An application fee for used oil transfer facilities not to exceed one
thousand three hundred dollars.
(dd) An application fee for an extension of the accumulation time by
hazardous waste generators not to exceed five hundred dollars.
(iv)(aa) Solid waste fees provided in Part VII of Title 33 of the Louisiana
Administrative Code may be increased by up to twenty-five percent.
(bb) Tonnage fees for non-industrial wastes provided for in LAC
33:VII.1505(B)(2)(b) may be applied for amounts exceeding twenty-five thousand
tons.
(v) Water quality fees in Part IX of Title 33 of the Louisiana Administrative
Code may be increased by up to ten percent. In addition the secretary is hereby
authorized to establish a fee schedule for the following:
(aa) A general permit for oil and gas wells in the coastal and territorial seas
provided for in LAC 33:IX.1309(N) charged annually based upon each application
for coverage under the general permit not to exceed one thousand seven hundred
fifty dollars.
(bb) A general permit for sewage sludge authorizations charged annually not
to exceed six hundred dollars.
(cc) An annual fee for sewage sludge individual permits not to exceed two
thousand dollars.
(vi)(aa) Underground storage tank fees provided for in Part XI of Title 33 of
the Louisiana Administrative Code may be increased by up to ten percent.
(bb) The secretary is hereby authorized to establish a fee schedule for the
amendment of registrations not to exceed sixty dollars.
(vii)(aa) Radiation protection fees in Part XV of Title 33 of the Louisiana
Administrative Code may be increased by up to ten percent.
(bb) The secretary is hereby authorized to establish a fee schedule for a
license renewal application fee not to exceed the new application fee.
Page 7 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 758 ENROLLED
(viii) Any increase authorized by this Subparagraph by a certain percentage
shall be rounded up to the nearest dollar.
(c) Within ninety days of the promulgation and adoption of any regulation
necessary to implement the fees authorized by Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph,
the department shall submit a written report to the Joint Legislative Committee on
the Budget for its approval which details the proposed use for the fee increase,
efforts to decrease the processing time for permits, efforts to increase the number of
inspections conducted at regulated facilities, enforcement activities, and efforts to
increase the collection of fines imposed by the department.
(a) Groundwater Protection Fees in Part I of Title 33 of the Louisiana
Administrative Code shall not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars for any one site
annually.
(b) Laboratory Accreditation Fees in Part I of Title 33 of the Louisiana
Administrative Code shall not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars per test
scope category annually.
(c) Air Quality Control Fees in Part III of Title 33 of the Louisiana
Administrative Code shall be based on the number of emissions points or the total
tons actually emitted. The application fee or annual fee per emission point shall not
exceed one hundred dollars per point. The annual fee per ton for criteria pollutants
shall not exceed one hundred dollars annually.
(i) Class I Toxic Air Pollutants shall be four times the criteria pollutant rate
annually.
(ii) Class II Toxic Air Pollutants shall be three times the criteria pollutant
rate annually.
(iii) Class III Toxic Air Pollutants shall be two times the criteria pollutant
rate annually.
(d) Hazardous Waste Fees in Part V of Title 33 of the Louisiana
Administrative Code shall not exceed seven hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
for any one permit annually.
Page 8 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 758 ENROLLED
(e) Solid Waste Fees in Part VII of Title 33 of the Louisiana Administrative
Code shall not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars for any one permit
annually.
(f) Water Quality Fees in Part IX of Title 33 of the Louisiana Administrative
Code shall not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars for any one permit
annually.
(g) Radiation Protection Fees in Part XV of Title 33 of the Louisiana
Administrative Code shall not exceed seven hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
for any one license annually.
* * *
(7) The department may require a fee to process any request for a declaratory
ruling, request for expedited permit, review of environmental conditions,
remediation and associated oversight and indirect costs, or review of a self audit not
to exceed the maximum per-hour overtime salary, including associated-related
benefits, of a civil service employee of the department per hour or portion thereof
required to conduct the review plus reasonable indirect costs calculated as a
percentage of the hourly fee. Such percentage shall be determined annually by
agreement between the department and the United States Environmental Protection
Agency for use on grants and contracts. However, the department may require a
requestor to pay a minimum fee of one thousand five hundred dollars.
E. In accordance with the provisions of Article VII, Section 2.1 of the
Constitution of Louisiana, and notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, the Department of Environmental Quality may modify any fee that is in
effect on June 30, 2026, as authorized by this Subtitle. The department shall
promulgate rules to determine these fees by using a formula to be based upon a cost
equal to the cost of the annual maintenance, permitting, monitoring, investigation,
administration, and other related activities, including any effects the volume of
emissions or effluents may have on such activities. These fees shall be adopted by
the department by rule in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S.
49:950 et seq.
Page 9 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 758 ENROLLED
F. The department shall promulgate rules to determine emergency processing
fees and late fees in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950
et seq. Emergency processing fees shall not exceed one and one half times the
regular fees. Late fees shall not exceed fifteen percent of the original fee amount.
G. Failure to pay the prescribed fee, as provided in this Subtitle, within
ninety days after the due date shall constitute a violation and shall subject the person
to applicable enforcement actions under the Louisiana Environmental Quality Act,
R.S. 30:2001 et seq. including but not limited to denial of an application and
revocation or suspension of the applicable permit, license, registration, or variance.
* * *
§2063. Prevention of accidental releases
* * *
J. The regulations authorized pursuant to this Section may provide for the
registration of each process covered by the regulations. In accordance with the
provisions of Article VII, Section 2.1 of the Constitution of Louisiana and R.S.
30:2014, the department is authorized to increase fees to cover the operating
expenses of the department for the continued implementation of the accidental
release prevention program. The fee increase shall be implemented by increasing,
on an average of four and one-half percent, existing fees assessed by the department
pursuant to its fee schedules under the air quality control program. The fee schedule
shall be based on industrial groups that reflect the degree that these are to be
regulated under the accidental release prevention program.
* * *
§2195.3. Source of funding; limitations on disbursements from the Tank Trust
Account; limit on amount in Tank Trust Account
* * *
B. All owners of motor fuel underground storage tanks storing new or used
motor oil shall pay to the secretary a fee not to exceed two hundred seventy-five
three hundred dollars per eligible underground motor fuel storage tank per year. Late
fees shall be established by the department by rule in accordance with the
Page 10 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 758 ENROLLED
Administrative Procedure Act. Failure to pay the prescribed fee as provided herein,
within ninety days after the due date, shall constitute a violation and shall subject the
person to applicable enforcement actions under the Louisiana Environmental Quality
Act, including but not limited to revocation or suspension of the applicable permit,
license, registration, or variance.
* * *
§2289.1. Requests for review, investigation, and oversight; fees
* * *
D. The department is hereby authorized to charge and collect a participation
fee not to exceed six hundred sixty dollars per application for approval of an
investigation plan, and a fee not to exceed six hundred sixty dollars per application
for approval of a remedial action plan. The department shall promulgate rules and
regulations to provide for reimbursement to the state of the actual direct costs
associated with oversight of activities conducted pursuant to this Part, such as
review, supervision, investigation, and monitoring. The department may charge and
collect only for reasonable and appropriate oversight of activities conducted pursuant
to this Part. When the department holds a public hearing, the applicant shall be
responsible for the actual costs of the public hearing, including but not limited to
building rental, security, court reporter, and hearing officer. These fees shall be
adopted by the department by rule in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq.
* * *
§2351.59. Fees
* * *
B. Licensure, certification, and accreditation fees shall be paid annually.
Notification fees are assessed for each lead abatement project. Fees shall be paid
upon application to the secretary department and deposited into the Lead Hazard
Reduction Dedicated Fund Account, R.S. 30:2351.41.
C.(1) License and certification fees shall be paid as follows:
Page 11 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 758 ENROLLED
(a) License evaluation fee of five hundred fifty dollars shall be paid by lead
contractors fees shall be paid annually.
(b) Certification fees shall be paid annually for the following disciplines:
(i) Lead project supervisor $ 275.00
(ii) Lead project designer $ 550.00
(iii) Risk assessor $ 275.00
(iv) Lead inspector $ 165.00
(v) Lead worker $ 55.00
(c) Emergency processing for licensure and certification fees shall be one
and one-half times the regular processing fee.
(d) (c) The secretary is authorized to establish subcategories within any
category.
(e) A person applying for licensure under more than one category shall pay
only the fee for the highest category.
(f) No fees shall be assessed to public entities or employees of public entities
for certification.
(2) Accreditation fees for training organizations and instructors shall be paid
as follows: annually.
(a) In-state training organizations (Louisiana domiciliaries):
(i) Application processing fee $ 550.00
(ii) Processing fee per instructor $ 55.00
(iii) Emergency processing 1.5 times the regular fees
(b) Out-of-state training organizations (non-Louisiana domiciliaries):
(i) Application processing fee $ 825.00
(ii) Processing fee per instructor $ 110.00
(iii) Emergency processing 1.5 times the regular fees
(3) Notification fees will be due upon application as follows: shall be
assessed for each lead abatement project. For the lead abatement of a building or
other structure, the fee shall be based upon the projected lead-based painted areas to
be abated in the abatement project. Areas of lead-contaminated soil associated with
Page 12 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 758 ENROLLED
the abatement process will be included in the projected square footage for the
building or structure.
(a) For the lead abatement of a building or other structure, the fee shall be
based upon the projected lead-based painted areas to be abated in the abatement
project. Areas of lead-contaminated soil associated with the abatement process will
be included in the projected square footage for the building or structure as follows:
(i) 2000 square feet and under $ 220.00
(ii) Each additional increment of 2000
square feet or portion thereof $ 110.00
(iii) Revisions to notification fees $ 55.00
(b) For the lead abatement of soil only, the fee shall be based upon the
projected acreage of the abatement project as follows:
(i) Half acre or less $ 220.00
(ii) Each additional half acre or
portion thereof $ 110.00
(iii) Revisions to notification fees $ 55.00
(c) Emergency notification processing fees will be one and one- half
times the regular fees.
(4) Any such formula for fees shall be adopted by the department by rule in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq.
Section 2. R.S. 37:3154(10) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3154. Board of Certification and Training; powers and duties; certificates;
revocation and suspension
* * *
(10) To establish appropriate fees for examination, training, and certification
to be paid by the applicant. fees that shall be determined using a formula developed
by rules to be based upon the cost of establishing a certification program for
operators of solid waste disposal facilities for examination, training, and
certification. Any such formula or fees shall be adopted by the department by rule
in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950 et seq. The
Page 13 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 758 ENROLLED
revenue generated from the fees shall be deposited into the Environmental Trust
Dedicated Fund Account.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 30:2014(D)(5) and (6) and 2044(C) are hereby repealed in their
entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 14 of 14
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.